Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
309H]

HAWAII
HEALTH CORPS

Section

309H-1 Definitions

309H-2 Hawaii health corps program established

309H-3 Hawaii rural health care provider loan
repayment

program

309H-4 Hawaii health corps first responder
service

obligation

309H-5 Rules

309H-6 Repealed

Note

Annual reports to legislature. L 2012, c 187, §3.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next